Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,244
Director, defined.

Director shall mean the Director of Agriculture or his or her designated employee, representative, or authorized agent.

Laws 1981, LB 487, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-216.09;

Laws 1991, LB 358, § 13.